src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/verb-tenses_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst

Tests:

  DESC ANA recognizes each form to full tags:
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Sing: acárie
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing: cárie
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Plur: acárier
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Plur: cárier
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Sing+1: [acárien, acárienye]
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing+1: [cárien, cárienye]
